Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1973
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the several groups need not be uniform.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 73.